Illinois, session 104th, SB1378.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Academic Degree Act is amended by changing 5Section 3 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 1010/3)  (from Ch. 144, par. 233)7    Sec. 3. Award of degrees.) A degree or any object in 8evidence thereof may be awarded only by a degree granting 9institution. Anything in this Act to the contrary 10notwithstanding, a degree granting institution may award 11honorary degrees; provided that any such degree be clearly 12represented to be honorary and that any other tangible object 13issued or purporting to be in evidence thereof shall state on 14its face expressly, clearly and conspicuously that the degree 15is honorary. With respect to a public university, only the 16board of trustees of the university may award an honorary 17degree, and the university's faculty shall have no role in the 18award of the honorary degree. 19(Source: P.A. 79-803.)